Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

248.990.
Penalties.

Any tobacco warehouseman, agent, manager, solicitor, corporation or organization that violates any of the provisions of KRS

248.320

to

248.340

or subsection (3) of KRS

248.350

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), and, if a corporation, it shall forfeit all corporate rights and privileges.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

248.400

shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

248.370

, or

248.440

, or willfully violates an administrative regulation of the department, or who refuses to pay the fee provided for by KRS

248.290

, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than three (3) months, or both.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

248.410

or

248.420

shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any person who fails or refuses to post notices in accordance with subsection (1) of KRS

248.430

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of failure or refusal.

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

248.430

shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS

248.450

shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (2) of KRS

248.450

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of violation.

Any person who violates KRS

248.610

shall be fined not less than $100 nor more than $1,000, or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) or subsection (2) of KRS

248.350

shall for each offense be fined not less than fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or be imprisoned for not less than three (3) months nor more than twelve (12) months, or both.

History.

42c-8, 42c-21 to 42c-24, 4814, 4814b-3, 4814b-4, 4814c-18: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 56, § 3; 1966, ch. 255, § 221; 1972, ch. 308, § 2; 1978, ch. 270, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 95, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 105, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.